Rhode Island, session 2025, SB155.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-130. Special plate for the American Hellenic Educational Progressive
Association.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the American Hellenic Educational Progressive
Association. The plates shall be designed to reference the American Hellenic Educational
Progressive Association.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) The American Hellenic Educational Progressive Association motor vehicle plates shall
be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the American Hellenic
Educational Progressive Association in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the
design approved by the Rhode Island state police.
(d) The American Hellenic Educational Progressive Association plates shall be subject to

compliance with § 31-3-117 relating to the number of minimum prepaid orders of plates per plate
type (i.e., passenger, commercial, etc.) and any required payment. The American Hellenic
Educational Progressive Association plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order
requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the American Hellenic Educational
Progressive Association and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production
until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paper work submitted to the division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other
procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, American Hellenic
Educational Progressive Association plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance
surcharge.
(g) The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to the American Hellenic Educational Progressive Association to
promote the ancient Hellenic ideals of education, philanthropy, civic responsibility, family, and
individual excellence through community service and volunteerism.
(h) A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to the American Hellenic Educational Progressive Association.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of American Hellenic
Educational Progressive Association plates, the American Hellenic Educational Progressive
Association must use any Rhode Island-sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-based
charitable organizations.
(j) American Hellenic Educational Progressive Association will be required to submit an
annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of American Hellenic Educational
Progressive Association plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect six (6) months after passage.
========
LC000077
========
LC000077 - Page 2 of 3